Utah statutes.
58-56-5.   Uniform Building Code Commission -- Composition of commission --
Commission duties and responsibilities -- Unified Code Analysis Council.
(1)  There is established a Uniform Building Code Commission to advise the
division with respect to the division's responsibilities in administering the
codes under this chapter.
(2)  The commission shall be appointed by the executive director who shall
submit those nominations to the governor for confirmation or rejection.  If a
nominee is rejected, alternative names shall be submitted until confirmation
is received.  Following confirmation by the governor, the appointment is
effective.
(3)  The commission shall consist of 11 members who shall be appointed in
accordance with the following:
(a)  one member shall be from among candidates nominated by the Utah League of
Cities and Towns and the Utah Association of Counties;
(b)  one member shall be a licensed building inspector employed by a political
subdivision of the state;
(c)  one member shall be a licensed professional engineer;
(d)  one member shall be a licensed architect;
(e)  one member shall be a fire official;
(f)  three members shall be contractors licensed by the state, of which one
shall be a general contractor, one an electrical contractor, and one a
plumbing contractor;
(g)  two members shall be from the general public and have no affiliation with
the construction industry or real estate development industry; and
(h)  one member shall be from the Division of Facilities Construction
Management, Department of Administrative Services.
(4) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (4)(b), as terms of current
commission members expire, the executive director shall appoint each new
member or reappointed member to a four-year term.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (4)(a), the executive
director shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length
of terms to ensure that the terms of commission members are staggered so that
approximately half of the commission is appointed every two years.
(5)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the executive
director shall appoint a replacement for the unexpired term.
(6) (a)  A commission member may not serve more than two full terms.
(b) A commission member who ceases to serve may not again serve on the
commission until after the expiration of two years from the date of cessation
of service.
(7)  A majority of the commission members constitute a quorum and may act on
behalf of the commission.
(8)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(9) (a)  The commission shall annually designate one of its members to serve
as chair of the commission.
(b)  The division shall provide a secretary to facilitate the function of the
commission and to record the commission's actions and recommendations.
(10)  The commission shall:
(a)  in accordance with Section 58-56-4, report to the Business and Labor
Interim Committee;
(b)  offer an opinion regarding the interpretation of or the application of a
code under this chapter if a person submits a request for an opinion;
(c)  act as an appeals board as provided in Section 58-56-8;
(d)  establish advisory peer committees on either a standing or ad hoc basis
to advise the commission with respect to matters related to a state
construction code or approved code, including a committee to advise the
commission regarding health matters related to a plumbing code; and
(e)  assist the division in overseeing code-related training in accordance
with Section 58-56-9.
(11)  A person requesting an opinion under Subsection (10)(c) shall submit a
formal request clearly stating:
(a)  the facts in question;
(b)  the specific citation at issue in a code under this chapter; and
(c)  the position taken by the persons involved in the facts in question.
(12) (a)  In a manner consistent with Subsection (10)(d), the commission shall
jointly create with the Utah Fire Prevention Board an advisory peer committee
known as the "Unified Code Analysis Council" to review fire prevention and
construction code issues that require definitive and specific analysis.
(b)  The commission and Utah Fire Prevention Board shall jointly, by rule made
in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
provide for:
(i)  the appointment of members to the Unified Code Analysis Council; and
(ii)  procedures followed by the Unified Code Analysis Council.
